Utah statutes.
31A-1-201.   Construction.

(1)  This code shall be liberally construed to achieve the purposes stated in Section 31A-1-102 and under other chapters of the Insurance Code.  The statements of purpose shall aid and guide interpretation but are not independent sources of power.

(2)  A provision of the Insurance Code relating to a particular kind of insurance or a particular type of insurer prevails over a provision relating to insurance or insurers in general if there is inconsistency between them.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

